Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.08
Trails; owner or lessee; duties;
negotiated written agreement; requirements.

(1) A private real property owner or lessee
of property adjoining a trail has no duty (a) to maintain or repair the trail
or (b) to protect users of the trail from danger resulting from conditions
on the trail unless such conditions are the result of an intentional or negligent
act of such owner or lessee.

(2) A negotiated
written agreement between a district and a private real property owner regarding
the acquisition of real property, or an interest therein, by the district
to establish and maintain a trail shall clearly express both parties' rights
and obligations, including the obligation of the district to maintain the
trail and the liability of the district for property damage or personal injury,
or both, to users of the trail.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 7.